District of Columbia statutes.
9-425.01

Sidewalk installation requirements.

(a)

For road segments that lack sidewalks on both sides of the street, road reconstruction, installation of a curb and gutter, or curb and gutter replacement shall include installation of a sidewalk on at least one side of the street.

(b)

For roadways that are missing sidewalks, but are not undergoing major construction, sidewalk installation shall be prioritized for the following areas:

(1)

Missing sidewalks in school areas;

(2)

Routes that provide access to parks and recreational facilities;

(3)

Transit stops;

(4)

Locations where the absence of a sidewalk creates substantial pedestrian safety risks; and

(5)

Roadway segments for which residents petitioned to have sidewalks.

(c)

The Mayor shall continue to accept and consider sidewalk petition requests from residents.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-227, § 2, 57 DCR 6923
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 6062, 60 DCR 12472

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “road reconstruction, installation of a curb and gutter, or curb and gutter replacement” for “road reconstruction or curb and gutter replacement” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6062 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6062 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 6061 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle G of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “Priority Sidewalk Assurance Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.